Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1111.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1316-C(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended to read:Section 1316-C. School security personnel.(a) School day.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law[, beginning]:(1) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, a school entity shall have at least one full-time school security personnel who has completed the training under section 1305-C, 1313-C(a.1) or 1314-C on duty during the school day unless the school entity has been granted a waiver under subsection (f).1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity shall have at least one full-time school security personnel who has completed the training under section 1305-C, 1313-C(a.1) or 1314-C on duty in each school building during the school day unless the school entity has been granted a waiver under subsection (f).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1111PN1346 - 2 - 12345678